Vermont statutes. Title 14A Trusts
Chapter 3. Representation

§ 301.
Representation; basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this chapter has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this chapter is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 411 and 602 of this title, a person who under this chapter may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor’s behalf.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is general and introductory, laying out the scope of the article.

Subsection (a) validates substitute notice to a person who may represent and bind another person as provided in the succeeding sections of this article. Notice to the substitute has the same effect as if given directly to the other person. Subsection (a) does not apply to notice of a judicial proceeding. Pursuant to Section 109(d), notice of a judicial proceeding must be given as provided in the applicable rules of civil procedure, which may require that notice not only be given to the representative but also to the person represented. For a model statute for the giving of notice in such cases, see Unif. Probate Code Section 1-403(3). Subsection (a) may be used to facilitate the giving of notice to the qualified beneficiaries of a proposed transfer of principal place of administration (Section 108(d)), of a proposed trust combination or division (Section 417), of a temporary assumption of duties without accepting trusteeship (Section 701(c)(1)), of a trustee’s resignation (Section 705(a)(1)), and of a trustee’s report (Section 813(c)).

Subsection (b) deals with the effect of a consent, whether by actual or virtual representation. Subsection (b) may be used to facilitate consent of the beneficiaries to modification or termination of a trust, with or without the consent of the settlor (Section 411), agreement of the qualified beneficiaries on appointment of a successor trustee of a noncharitable trust (Section 704(c)(2)), and a beneficiary’s consent to or release or affirmance of the actions of a trustee (Section 1009). A consent by a representative bars a later objection by the person represented, but a consent is not binding if the person represented raises an objection prior to the date the consent would otherwise become effective. The possibility that a beneficiary might object to a consent given on the beneficiary’s behalf will not be germane in many cases because the person represented will be unborn or unascertained. However, the representation principles of this article will sometimes apply to adult and competent beneficiaries. For example, while the trustee of a revocable trust entitled to a pourover devise has authority under Section 303 to approve the personal representative’s account on behalf of the trust beneficiaries, such consent would not be binding on a trust beneficiary who registers an objection. Subsection (b) implements cases such as
Barber v. Barber
, 837 P.2d 714 (Alaska 1992), which held that the a refusal to allow an objection by an adult competent remainder beneficiary violated due process.

Subsection (c) implements the policy of Sections 411 and 602 requiring express authority in the power of attorney or approval of court before the settlor’s agent, conservator or guardian may consent on behalf of the settlor to the termination or revocation of the settlor’s revocable trust.

§ 302.
Representation by holder of general testamentary power of appointment.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the holder of a general testamentary power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder may represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section specifies the circumstances under which a holder of a general testamentary power of appointment may receive notices on behalf of and otherwise represent and bind persons whose interests are subject to the power, whether as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise. Such representation is allowed except to the extent there is a conflict of interest with respect to the particular matter or dispute. Typically, the holder of a general testamentary power of appointment is also a life income beneficiary of the trust, oftentimes of a trust intended to qualify for the federal estate tax marital deduction.
See
I.R.C. § 2056(b)(5). Without the exception for conflict of interest, the holder of the power could act in a way that could enhance the holder’s income interests to the detriment of the appointees or takers in default, whoever they may be.

§ 303.
Representation by fiduciaries and parents.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

a guardian of the property may represent and bind the estate that the guardian controls;

a guardian of the person may represent and bind the ward if a guardian of the ward’s estate has not been appointed;

an agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

a trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

a personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate; and

a parent may represent and bind the parent’s minor or unborn child if a guardian for the child has not been appointed.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section allows for representation of persons by their fiduciaries (conservators, guardians, agents, trustees, and personal representatives), a principle that has long been part of the law. Subdivision (6), which allows parents to represent their children, is more recent, having originated in 1969 upon approval of the Uniform Probate Code. This section is not limited to representation of beneficiaries. It also applies to representation of the settlor. Representation is not available if the fiduciary or parent is in a conflict position with respect to the particular matter or dispute, however. A typical conflict would be where the fiduciary or parent seeking to represent the beneficiary is either the trustee or holds an adverse beneficial interest.

Subdivision (2) authorizes a guardian to bind and represent a ward if a conservator of the ward’s estate has not been appointed. Granting a guardian authority to represent the ward with respect to interests in the trust can avoid the need to seek appointment of a conservator. This grant of authority to act with respect to the ward’s trust interest may broaden the authority of a guardian in some States although not in States that have adopted the Section 1-403 of the Uniform Probate Code, from which this section was derived. Under the Uniform Trust Code, a “conservator” is appointed by the court to manage the ward’s property, a “guardian” to make decisions with respect to the ward’s personal affairs.
See
Section 103.

Subdivision (3) authorizes an agent to represent a principal only to the extent the agent has authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute. Pursuant to Sections 411 and 602, an agent may represent a settlor with respect to the amendment, revocation or termination of the trust only to the extent this authority is expressly granted either in the trust or the power. Otherwise, depending on the particular question or dispute, a general grant of authority in the power may be sufficient to confer the necessary authority.

§ 304.
Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest with respect to the particular question between the representative and the person represented.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section authorizes a person with a substantially identically interest with respect to a particular question or dispute to represent and bind an otherwise unrepresented minor, incapacitated or unborn individual, or person whose location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable. This section is derived from Section 1-403(2)(iii) of the Uniform Probate Code, but with several modifications. Unlike the UPC, this section does not expressly require that the representation be adequate, the drafters preferring to leave this issue to the courts. Furthermore, this section extends the doctrine of virtual representation to representation of minors and incapacitated individuals. Finally, this section does not apply to the extent there is a conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

Restatement (First) of Property §§ 181 and 185 (1936) provide that virtual representation is inapplicable if the interest represented was not sufficiently protected. Representation is deemed sufficiently protective as long as it does not appear that the representative acted in hostility to the interest of the person represented. Restatement (First) of Property § 185 (1936). Evidence of inactivity or lack of skill is material only to the extent it establishes such hostility. Restatement (First) of Property § 185 cmt. b (1936).

Typically, the interests of the representative and the person represented will be identical. A common example would be a trust providing for distribution to the settlor’s children as a class, with an adult child being able to represent the interests of children who are either minors or unborn. Exact identity of interests is not required, only substantial identity with respect to the particular question or dispute. Whether such identity is present may depend on the nature of the interest. For example, a presumptive remaindermen may be able to represent alternative remaindermen with respect to approval of a trustee’s report but not with respect to interpretation of the remainder provision or termination of the trust. Even if the beneficial interests of the representative and person represented are identical, representation is not allowed in the event of conflict of interest. The representative may have interests outside of the trust that are adverse to the interest of the person represented, such as a prior relationship with the trustee or other beneficiaries. See Restatement (First) of Property § 185 cmt. d (1936).

§ 305.
Appointment of representative.

If the Probate Division of the Superior Court determines that an interest is not represented under this chapter, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may appoint a representative to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

A representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this title, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a representative may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual’s family.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 20

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.